Tennessee, session 114, HB2210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-106(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting instead the following:
(6) Make recommendations to the general assembly for preparedness,
prevention, and mitigation measures designed to:
(A) Eliminate emergencies or reduce their impact; and
(B) Improve disaster response;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2210
012606
- 1 -